Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-668.02
Unemployment compensation; services
performed in another state; reimbursements to and from other states.

Reimbursements paid from the fund pursuant to subdivisions (1)(c) and (1)(d) of section 48-668
shall be deemed to be benefits for the purposes of the Employment Security
Law. The commissioner is authorized to make to other state or federal agencies
and to receive from such other state or federal agencies reimbursements from
or to the fund in accordance with arrangements entered into pursuant to section
48-668.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 18, p. 402;

Laws 1939, c. 56, § 12, p. 251;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-717;

R.S.1943, § 48-668;

Laws 1945, c. 115, § 8, p. 387;

Laws 1949, c. 163, § 17(3), p. 434;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 50;

Laws 2009, LB631, § 13.